Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201476-1516
Violations; penalty; injunction;
Attorney General, county attorney, duties.

Any trust, other
than a family trust, authorized trust, or testamentary trust, violating sections
76-1507 to 76-1516 shall upon conviction be punished by a fine of
not more than fifty thousand dollars and shall divest itself of any land acquired
in violation of sections 76-1507 to 76-1516 within one year after
conviction. The courts of this state may prevent and restrain violations of
this section through the issuance of an injunction. The Attorney General or
a county attorney shall institute suits on behalf of the state to prevent
and restrain violations of sections 76-1507 to 76-1516.

Laws 1981, LB 9, § 10;

Laws 2011, LB160, § 2.